Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Slum Clearance and Redevelopment Act.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, §§ 16 — 23.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

Validity of statutes providing for urban redevelopment by private enterprise. 44 A.L.R.2d 1414.

What constitutes “blighted area” within urban renewal and redevelopment statutes. 45 ALR3d 1096.

Liability of urban redevelopment authority or other state or municipal agency or entity for injuries occurring in vacant or abandoned property owned by governmental entity. 7 ALR4th 1129.

Validity, construction, and application of inclusionary zoning ordinances and programs. 22 ALR6th 295.

Sec. 18.55.480.
Findings and declaration of necessity.

The legislature finds and declares that

slum and blighted areas exist in localities throughout the state and they constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious and inimical to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the state;

the existence of these slum and blighted areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, necessitating excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime prevention, correction, prosecution, punishment, and the treatment of juvenile delinquency and for the maintenance of adequate police, fire, and accident protection and other public services and facilities, and constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, and retards the provisions of housing accommodations;

this menace is beyond remedy and control solely by regulatory process in the exercise of the police power and cannot be dealt with effectively by the ordinary operations of private enterprise without the aids provided in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

;

the elimination of slum conditions or conditions of blight, the acquisition and preparation of land in or necessary to the redevelopment of slum or blighted areas and its sale or lease for development or redevelopment in accordance with comprehensive plans and redevelopment plans of municipalities, and any assistance that may be given by any public body in connection therewith are public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and private property acquired; and

the necessity in the public interest for the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

is a matter for legislative determination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The express purpose of this section is entirely consistent with a local government’s exercise of powers on the same subject.
Feb. 2, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.55.490.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

to take advantage of 42 U.S.C. 1441 — 1469c (Title I of the Housing Act of 1949 (P.L. 81-171; 63 Stat. 413)), as amended.

History.

(§ 23 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1970; am § 44 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Congress has substantially repealed provisions of 42 U.S.C. 1450 — 1469c that relate to slum clearance, urban renewal projects, and neighborhood development programs, referred to in this section, and, in 42 U.S.C. 5316, has terminated the authority to make grants or loans under the repealed sections.

Sec. 18.55.500.
Interest of members of board of directors or employees of corporation in project prohibited.

A member of the board of directors or employee of the corporation may not voluntarily acquire an interest, direct or indirect, in a redevelopment project or in property included or planned by the corporation to be included in a redevelopment project, or in a contract or proposed contract in connection with a project. If the acquisition is not voluntary the member or employee shall immediately disclose the interest in writing to the corporation and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the corporation.

If a member of the board of directors or employee of the corporation owns or controls or owned or controlled within the preceding two years an interest, direct or indirect, in property that the member or employee knows is included or planned by the corporation to be included in a redevelopment project, the member or employee shall immediately disclose the interest in writing to the corporation and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the corporation, and the member or employee may not participate in an action by the corporation affecting the property.

A violation of this section constitutes misconduct in office or dereliction of duties of employment or both.

History.

(§ 4 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 45 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was formerly the last sentence of subsection (b); relettered in 2002.

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

Sec. 18.55.510.
Finding of necessity by municipality.

The corporation may not transact business or exercise its powers under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

in a municipality until the governing body approves by resolution the exercise in the municipality of the powers, functions, and duties of the corporation under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

.

The governing body of a municipality may not adopt a resolution under (a) of this section unless it finds that

one or more slum or blighted areas exist in the municipality; or

the redevelopment of the slum or blighted area is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of the municipality.

When the governing body of a municipality adopts the resolution, it shall promptly notify the corporation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 46 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (c) of this section.

Sec. 18.55.520.
Powers of the corporation.

In addition to all powers previously vested in or granted to the corporation by any other law, the corporation has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, including the following powers:

to prepare or have prepared and to recommend redevelopment plans to the governing body of any municipality within its area of operation and to undertake and carry out redevelopment projects within its area of operation;

to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair, by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities for or in connection with a redevelopment project; and notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

or any other provision of law, to agree to the conditions that it considers reasonable and appropriate that are attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of a redevelopment project, and to include a contract let in connection with a redevelopment project, provisions to fulfill any of these conditions it considers reasonable and appropriate;

within its area of operation,

to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, eminent domain, or otherwise, any real or personal property or any interest in it, together with any improvements on it necessary or incidental to a redevelopment project;

to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment the property it obtains under (A) of this paragraph;

to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, subdivide, retain for its own use, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in it;

to enter into contracts with redevelopers of property containing covenants, restrictions, and conditions regarding the use of the property for residential, commercial, industrial, recreational purposes or for public purposes in accordance with the redevelopment plan and other covenants, restrictions, and conditions that the corporation considers necessary to prevent a recurrence of slum or blighted areas or to effectuate the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

;

to make any covenant, restriction, or condition of the foregoing contracts a covenant running with the land, and to provide appropriate remedies for a breach of the covenant, restriction, or condition, including the right in the corporation to terminate the contract and the interest in the property created under the contract;

to borrow money and issue bonds and provide security for loans or bonds;

to insure or provide for the insurance of real or personal property or operations of the corporation against risk or hazard, including the power to pay premiums on this insurance;

to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

; however, statutory provisions with respect to the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by another public body do not restrict the corporation or the other public body in these functions, unless the legislature has specifically so provided;

to invest money held in reserves or sinking funds or any money not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest money subject to their control, and to redeem its bonds at the redemption price established in the bonds or to purchase its bonds at less than redemption price; and all bonds redeemed or purchased shall be cancelled;

to borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions, and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, municipality, or other public body or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, to give the security required and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection with the transaction; notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the corporation may include in a contract for financial assistance with the federal government for a redevelopment project those conditions imposed pursuant to federal law that the corporation considers reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

;

to act through a member or another person designated by the corporation to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information; to administer oaths, and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are outside the state or unable to attend before the corporation, or excused from attendance; to make available to appropriate agencies or public officials, including those charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions or of demolishing unsafe or unsanitary structures or eliminating slums or conditions of blight within its area of operation, its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist that are dangerous to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare;

within its area of operation, to make or have made all surveys, appraisals, studies, and plans necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

and to contract or cooperate with persons or agencies, public or private, in the making and carrying out of the surveys, appraisals, studies, and plans;

to prepare plans and provide reasonable assistance for the relocation of families displaced from a redevelopment project area to the extent essential for acquiring possession of and clearing the area or parts of the area to permit the carrying out of the redevelopment project;

to make expenditures that are necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, and to make expenditures from money obtained from the federal government and the state, without regard to any other laws pertaining to the making and approval of appropriations and expenditures;

to exercise all or any part or combination of powers granted by this section;

with the approval of the local governing body,

before approval of an urban renewal or redevelopment plan, or approval of any modifications of the plan, to acquire real property in an urban renewal or redevelopment area, to demolish and remove any structures on the property, and pay all costs related to the acquisition, demolition, or removal, including any administrative or relocation expenses; and

to assume the responsibility to bear any loss that may arise as the result of the exercise of its powers under this paragraph in the event that the real property is not made part of the urban renewal or redevelopment project;

to prepare or have prepared and to recommend neighborhood development plans to the governing body of any municipality within its area of operation and to undertake and carry out neighborhood development projects within its area of operation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1970; am § 47 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, “paragraph” was substituted for “subsection” in (11)(B) of this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 79, SLA 1964.

Cross references. —

For the powers of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation generally, see AS

18.56.090

.

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 15 AAC 150, art. 3.

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

Sec. 18.55.525.
Neighborhood development projects.

A neighborhood development project, as undertaken and administered by the corporation, shall consist of urban renewal project undertakings and activities in one or more urban renewal areas that are planned and carried out on the basis of annual increments in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1469 — 1469c (secs. 131 — 134, Title I, Housing Act of 1949), as amended.

The corporation shall adhere to the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

in its planning and carrying out of a neighborhood development project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 130 SLA 1970; am § 48 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Editor’s notes. —

42 U.S.C. 5316 terminates the authority to make grants or loans under
42 U.S.C. 1469 — 1469c, referred to in (a) of this section, and
42 U.S.C. 1469 — 1469c no longer appears in the United States Code.

Sec. 18.55.530.
Preparation and approval of redevelopment plans.

Except as provided in AS

18.55.520

(11), the corporation may not acquire real property for a redevelopment project unless the governing body of the municipality has approved the redevelopment plan, as prescribed in (i) of this section.

The corporation may not prepare a redevelopment plan for a redevelopment project area unless the governing body of the municipality has, by resolution, declared the area to be a slum or blighted area in need of redevelopment.

The corporation may not recommend a redevelopment plan to the governing body of the municipality until a general plan for the physical development of the municipality has been prepared.

The corporation may prepare or have prepared a redevelopment plan or any person or agency, public or private, may submit a redevelopment plan to the corporation. A redevelopment plan must be sufficiently complete to indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements and the proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment project area, and must include

the boundaries of the redevelopment project area, with a map showing the existing uses and conditions of the real property within those boundaries;

a land use plan showing proposed uses of the area;

information showing the standards of population densities, land coverage, and building intensities in the area after redevelopment;

a statement of the proposed changes, if any, in zoning ordinances or maps, street layouts, street levels or grades, building codes, and ordinances;

a site plan of the area; and

a statement as to the kind and number of additional public facilities or utilities that will be required to support the new land uses in the area after redevelopment.

Before recommending a redevelopment plan to the governing body for approval, the corporation shall submit the plan to the planning commission, if any, of the area in which the redevelopment project area is located for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the physical development of the area. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed redevelopment plan to the corporation within 30 days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission or, if recommendations are not received within 30 days, then without the recommendations, the corporation may recommend the redevelopment plan to the governing body of the municipality for approval.

Before recommending a redevelopment plan to the governing body for approval, the corporation shall consider whether the proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment project area are designed with the general purpose of accomplishing, in conformance with the general plan, a coordinated, adjusted, and harmonious development of the municipality and its environs that will, in accordance with present and future needs, promote health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity, and the general welfare, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development and, including, among other things, adequate provision for traffic, vehicular parking, the promotion of safety from fire, panic, and other dangers, adequate provision for light and air, the promotion of the healthful and convenient distribution of population, the provision of adequate transportation, water, sewerage, and other public utilities, schools, parks, recreational and community facilities, and other public requirements, the promotion of sound design and arrangement, the wise and efficient expenditure of public funds, the prevention of the recurrence of unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations, slums, or conditions of blight, and the provision of adequate, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations.

The recommendation of a redevelopment plan by the corporation to the governing body shall be accompanied by

the recommendations, if any, of the planning commission concerning the redevelopment plan;

a statement of the proposed method and estimated cost of the acquisition and preparation for redevelopment of the redevelopment project area and the estimated proceeds or revenues from its disposal to redevelopers;

a statement of the proposed method of financing the redevelopment project; and

a statement of a feasible method proposed for the relocation of families to be displaced from the redevelopment project area.

The governing body shall hold a public hearing on the redevelopment plan or substantial modification of the redevelopment plan recommended by the corporation, after public notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality once each week for two consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least 10 days before the date set for hearing, or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation, by posting the notice in three public places in the municipality at least 10 days before the date set for hearing. The notice must describe the time, place, and purpose of the hearing and must generally identify the area to be redeveloped under the plan. At the public hearing all interested parties shall be given a reasonable opportunity to express their views respecting the proposed redevelopment plan.

Following the hearing required by (h) of this section, the governing body may by ordinance initially approve a redevelopment plan if it finds that the plan is feasible and conforms with the general plan for the physical development of the area. Approval of subsequent modifications of the plan that do not involve substantive changes shall be by resolution. A redevelopment plan that has not been approved by the governing body when recommended by the corporation may again be recommended to it with any modifications considered advisable.

The corporation may modify a redevelopment plan at any time. However, if it is modified after the lease or sale of real property in the redevelopment project area, the redeveloper or the developer’s successor in interest affected by the proposed modification must consent to the modification. If the proposed modification will substantially change the redevelopment plan as previously approved by the governing body, the modification must similarly be approved by the governing body.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the local governing body certifies that an area is in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of flood, fire, hurricane, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe respecting which the governor has certified the need for disaster assistance under federal law, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal or redevelopment plan and an urban renewal or redevelopment project with respect to the area without regard to the provisions relating to relocation, conformance of the urban renewal or redevelopment plan with the general plan, and the provisions of this chapter requiring a general plan for the municipality and a public hearing on the urban renewal or redevelopment project or plan.

History.

(§ 6 ch 105 SLA 1951; am §§ 3, 4 ch 79 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1966; am §§ 49 — 55 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section.

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

Sec. 18.55.540.
Disposal of property in redevelopment project.

The corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest in real property in a redevelopment project area to a redeveloper for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, or for public use in accordance with the redevelopment plan, subject to those covenants, conditions, and restrictions it considers in the public interest or to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

. However, the sale, lease, exchange, or other transfer, or an agreement relating to it, may be made only after, or subject to, the approval of the redevelopment plan by the governing body of the municipality. The real property shall be sold, leased, or transferred at its fair value for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan although the fair value may be less than the cost of acquiring and preparing the property for redevelopment. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan, the corporation shall consider the uses and purposes required by the redevelopment plan, the restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the redeveloper of the property, the objectives of the redevelopment plan for the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas, and the other matters the corporation specifies as appropriate. In fixing rentals and selling prices, the corporation shall consider appraisals of the property for these uses that are made by land experts employed by the corporation.

Before considering a redevelopment contract proposal, the corporation, by public notice published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation, by posting the notice in three public places in the municipality, shall invite proposals from, and make available all pertinent information to private redevelopers or to persons interested in undertaking the redevelopment of an area or any part of an area that the governing body has declared to be in need of redevelopment. The notice must identify the area and must state that the further information that is available may be obtained at the office of the corporation. The corporation shall consider all redevelopment proposals and the financial and legal ability of the prospective redevelopers to carry out their proposals and may negotiate with redevelopers for proposals for the purchase or lease of real property in the redevelopment project area. The corporation may accept the redevelopment contract proposal it considers in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, provided that the corporation has given to the governing body at least 30 days’ written notice of its intent to accept the redevelopment contract proposal. Thereafter the corporation may execute a redevelopment contract in accordance with the provisions of (a) of this section and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate the redevelopment contract. The corporation may, without regard to the foregoing provisions of this subsection, dispose of real property in a redevelopment project area to private redevelopers for redevelopment under the reasonable competitive bidding procedures it prescribes, subject to the provisions of (a) of this section.

The corporation may temporarily operate and maintain real property in a redevelopment project area pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment, without regard to the provisions of (a) and (b) of this section, for uses and purposes that it considers desirable even though not in conformity with the redevelopment plan.

A person owning land in the urban renewal area at the time of the approval of the urban renewal plan by the governing body of the municipality may, with approval of the governing body and under regulations, conditions, and limitations the corporation prescribes, be granted a preferred right to purchase or lease land within the redevelopment area. This preferred right shall be exercised within 15 days after public notice of the date of the intended leasing or sale of land within the area. Public notice shall be given in substantially the manner set forth in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1957; am §§ 56, 57 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (c) and (d) of this section.

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

Sec. 18.55.550.
Eminent domain.

The corporation may

acquire by eminent domain real property that it considers necessary within the boundaries of the redevelopment project or for its purposes under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described in the resolution is necessary for those purposes; and

exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided in AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

or in the manner provided by other statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in the same manner, provided that real property belonging to the municipality or the state may not be acquired without its consent.

History.

(§ 8 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 58 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.560.
Acquisition and development of undeveloped vacant land.

Upon a determination, by resolution, of the governing body of the municipality that the acquisition and development of undeveloped vacant land not within a slum or blighted area is essential to the proper clearance or redevelopment of a slum or blighted area or a necessary part of the general slum clearance program of the municipality, the acquisition, planning, preparation for development or disposal of the land shall constitute a redevelopment project that may be undertaken by the corporation in the manner provided in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

. The determination by the governing body is a substitute for the declaration required by AS

18.55.530(b)

but the determination may not be made until the governing body finds that

there is a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing in the municipality;

the undeveloped vacant land will be developed for predominantly residential uses; and

the provisions of dwelling accommodations on the undeveloped vacant land is necessary to accomplish the relocation in decent, safe, and sanitary housing in the municipality, of families to be displaced from slum or blighted areas that are to be redeveloped.

History.

(§ 9 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 59 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.570.
Issuance of bonds and notes.

The corporation may

issue bonds and notes from time to time for any of the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, including the payment of principal and interest upon advances for surveys and plans for redevelopment projects;

issue refunding bonds for the purpose of the payment or retirement or in exchange for bonds previously issued by it;

issue the types of bonds and notes it determines, including bonds and notes on which the principal and interest are payable

exclusively from the income, proceeds, and revenues of the redevelopment project financed with the proceeds of the bonds or notes; or

exclusively from the income, proceeds, and revenue of any of its redevelopment projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds or notes; and

further secure the bonds or notes authorized by (1) — (3) of this subsection by a pledge of all or any part of a loan, grant, or contribution from the federal government or from another source, or by a mortgage of a redevelopment project of the corporation.

The members of the board of directors of the corporation or a person executing the bonds or notes authorized by (a) of this section are not liable personally on the bonds or notes by reason of the issuance of them. The bonds, notes, and other obligations of the corporation are not a debt of the municipality, the state, or the United States, and neither the municipality, the state, nor the United States is liable on them, nor are the bonds, notes, or obligations payable out of money or property other than those of the corporation acquired for the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

and each bond and note shall state this on its face. A bond or note does not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Bonds and notes of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest on them and income from them, are exempt from all taxes.

Bonds and notes of the corporation issued under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear the date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at the time or times, bear interest at the rate or rates provided, be in the denomination or denominations, be in the form either coupon or registered, carry the conversion or registration privileges, have the rank or priority, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption, with or without premium, which the resolution, its trust indenture, or mortgage provides.

Bonds and notes may be sold in the manner, on the terms, and at the price the corporation determines.

If a member of the board of directors or officer of the corporation whose signature appears on a bond, note, or coupon ceases to be a member or officer before the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the member or officer had remained in office until delivery. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, bonds and notes issued under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

are negotiable.

In an action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of a bond or note or security for a bond or note issued under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, where the bond or note recites in substance that it has been issued by the corporation to aid in financing a redevelopment project, the bond or note is conclusive proof that it has been issued for that purpose and the project is conclusively considered to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the purposes and provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 139 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 30 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 38 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 60 — 62 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (c), (d), and (f) of this section.

Sec. 18.55.580.
Power of corporation to provide additional security for bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases, in order to secure the payment of the bonds or obligations, the corporation, in addition to its other powers, may

pledge all or a part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenue from redevelopment projects to which its right exists or may come into existence;

mortgage all or a part of its real or personal property in a redevelopment project owned or later acquired;

covenant against pledging all or a part of its rents, fees, and revenue from redevelopment projects or against mortgaging all or a part of its real or personal property in a redevelopment project to which its right or title exists or may come into existence or against permitting or suffering a lien on the revenue or property, and covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of a redevelopment project or a part of a project, and covenant as to other, or additional debts or obligations that may be incurred by it;

covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of the bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds, and provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds, covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest, and covenant for the redemption of the bonds and to provide the terms and conditions of redemption;

covenant, subject to the limitations contained in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, as to the amount of revenue to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenue, and as to their use and disposition, and create or authorize the creation of special funds for money held for operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and covenant as to the use and disposition of the money held in these funds;

prescribe the procedure by which the terms of a contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

covenant as to the use, maintenance, and replacement of any or all of its real or personal property in a redevelopment project, the insurance to be carried and the use and disposition of insurance money, and warrant its title to that property;

covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of a covenant, condition, or obligation, and covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived;

vest in any obligees of the corporation the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds;

vest in any obligee or obligees holding a specified amount in bonds the right, in the event of a default by the corporation, to take possession of and use, operate, and manage a redevelopment project or a part of a project, title to which is in the corporation, or money connected with a project, and to collect the rent and revenue arising from the project or part of the project and to dispose of the money in accordance with the agreement of the corporation with the obligees;

provide for the powers and duties of the obligees and limit their liability;

provide the terms and conditions upon which the obligees may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds;

exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

;

make the covenants and do any and all acts and things necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of the corporation, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable even if the covenants, acts, or things are not enumerated in this section.

The corporation may, by resolution, trust, indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract confer upon an obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, the right, in addition to all rights that may be conferred, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in the resolution or instrument, by an action or proceeding in a competent court

to have possession of a redevelopment project or part of one, title to which is in the corporation, surrendered to the obligee;

to obtain the appointment of a receiver of a redevelopment project or part of a project, title to which is in the corporation, and of the rents and profits from the project or part, and, if a receiver is appointed, the receiver may enter and take possession of, carry out, operate, and maintain the project or a part of the project and may collect and receive all fees, rents, revenue, or other charges thereafter arising from the project or part, and shall keep this money in a separate account and apply it in accordance with the obligations of the corporation as the court directs; and

to require the corporation, the members of its board of directors, officers, agents, and employees to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

(§ 11 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 63 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 30 ch 30 SLA 1996)